Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB748.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3.1(b) and (c), 3.2(b) and (c) and 3.3(1), (2), (3), (4) and (5) of the act of May 11, 1889 (P.L.188, No.210), entitled "A further supplement to an act, entitled 'An act to establish a board of wardens for the Port of Philadelphia, and for the regulation of pilots and pilotage, and for other purposes,' approved March twenty-ninth, one thousand eight hundred and three, and for regulating the rates of pilotage and number of pilots," are amended to read:Section 3.1. For services rendered on and after January 1, 1990, retroactively, the rates of pilotage for conducting a vessel from the Capes of the Delaware to a place on the Delaware 12345678910111213141516171819202122 River or Bay no further upriver than the Delair Railroad Bridge between Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, and Delair, New Jersey, or from a place on the river Delaware no further upriver than the Delair Railroad Bridge between Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, and Delair, New Jersey, to the Capes of the Delaware, in either case, shall be computed as follows:* * *(b) The charges per unit shall be as follows:(xi) Effective January 1, 2022............. $14.91 per unit(xii) Effective January 1, 2023............ $15.66 per unit(xiii) Effective January 1, 2024........... $16.44 per unit(xiv) Effective January 1, 2025............ $17.26 per unit(xv) Effective January 1, 2026 ............. $17.78 per unit(xvi) Effective January 1, 2027 ............ $18.31 per unit(xvii) Effective January 1, 2028 ........... $18.86 per unit(c) There shall be a minimum charge of two hundred units and a maximum unit charge as follows:(xi) Effective January 1, 2022............. 1,550 units(xii) Effective January 1, 2023............ 1,550 units(xiii) Effective January 1, 2024........... 1,550 units(xiv) Effective January 1, 2025............ 1,550 units(xv) Effective January 1, 2026 ............. 1,600 units(xvi) Effective January 1, 2027 ............ 1,600 units(xvii) Effective January 1, 2028 ........... 1,600 unitsSection 3.2. That every ship or vessel bound to the Delaware breakwater for orders shall be obliged to receive a pilot, provided she is spoken or a pilot offers his services, outside of a straight line drawn from Cape Henlopen Light to Cape May Light, and every ship or vessel bound to the breakwater for orders shall pay pilotage fees as follows: A sum equal to half 20250SB0748PN0919 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the pilotage to the Port of Philadelphia, and she shall be obliged to take a pilot and pay the same pilotage fees when outward bound, from the breakwater, and if such ship or vessel, without discharging her pilot, proceed to the Port of Philadelphia or any other port or place on the bay or river Delaware, only one full pilotage fee as fixed by section 3.1 of this act, for the entire service, in addition to the fee for detention: Provided, however, That if the pilot bringing such ship or vessel to the breakwater be there discharged, and the ship or vessel afterward proceed to Philadelphia or any other port or place on the bay or river Delaware, she shall make the usual signal for a pilot and continue to make such signal till reaching Brandywine Light, and if spoken by, or offered the services of, a duly licensed Pennsylvania pilot before reaching Brandywine Light, shall be obliged to employ such pilot and pay him for services rendered on and after the effective date of this act, a charge computed as follows:* * *(b) The charges per unit shall be as follows:[(xi) Effective January 1, 2022............ $14.91 per unit(xii) Effective January 1, 2023............ $15.66 per unit(xiii) Effective January 1, 2024........... $16.44 per unit](xiv) Effective January 1, 2025............ $17.26 per unit(xv) Effective January 1, 2026 ............. $17.78 per unit(xvi) Effective January 1, 2027 ............ $18.31 per unit(xvii) Effective January 1, 2028 ........... $18.61 per unit(XVII) EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028............ $18.86 PER UNIT(c) There shall be a minimum charge of two hundred units and a maximum unit charge as follows:[(xi) Effective January 1, 2022............ 1,550 units20250SB0748PN0919 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xii) Effective January 1, 2023............ 1,550 units(xiii) Effective January 1, 2024........... 1,550 units](xiv) Effective January 1, 2025............ 1,550 units(xv) Effective January 1, 2026 ............. 1,600 units(xvi) Effective January 1, 2027 ............ 1,600 units(xvii) Effective January 1, 2028 ........... 1,600 unitsSection 3.3. The following charges are hereby authorized for the services stated:(1) Ship communication charge:Vessels transiting the Delaware River.......... [$275.00] $300.00(2) Transporting vessels in the Delaware:Philadelphia (or other place) to Marcus Hook... [1,000.00] 1,250.00Philadelphia (or other place) below Marcus Hook [1,000.00] 1,250.00Philadelphia Harbor to Torresdale.............. [1,000.00] 1,250.00Philadelphia Harbor to any place above Torresdale........................................ [1,200.00] 1,500.00(3) Extra services:Swing ship to adjust magnetic compass.......... 300.00Swing ship to calibrate direction finder....... 300.00Vessels anchoring below Brown Shoal in excess of three hours awaiting flood tide for transiting river channel..................................... [500.00] 750.00Carried to/from Baltimore...................... 600.00Carried to/from Norfolk........................ 1,000.0020250SB0748PN0919 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Carried to/from New York....................... 1,000.00Vessels entering the Capes for anchorage at the Breakwater for other than tide shall pay one-half pilotage in and one-half pilotage out.(4) Chesapeake and Delaware Canal:Vessels transiting the Chesapeake and Delaware Canal:Vessels with a length overall of less than 650 feet.............................................. [1,000.00] 1,250.00Vessels with a length overall of 650 feet or more.............................................. [1,500.00] 1,750.00(5) Cancellation of sailing orders:Cancellation charge............................ [1,000.00] minimum pilotageAny time a pilot is dispatched for sailing and the trip or movement is canceled, for reason other than weather, the vessel shall be subject to this charge, except when the Pilot Office is notified as follows:All piers north of Hog Island - 1 1/2 hours before sailing time.All piers north of Paulsboro - 2 hours before sailing time.All piers south of the above - 3 hours before sailing time.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0748PN0919 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627